Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 7
LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGES - REVENUE SECURITIES LAW

Editor's note:

This part 7 is similar to article 71 of title 22 as said article existed prior to 1975.

23-71-701. Short title.

This part 7 shall be known and may be cited as the "Local District College Revenue Securities Law".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 781, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-702. Definitions.

As used in this part 7, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the governing body of a district or any successor governing body of the district.

"District" means any local college district operating pursuant to the laws of this state.

"Facilities" means buildings, structures, or other income-producing facilities from the operation of which or in connection with which pledged revenues for the payment of any securities issued under this part 7 are derived, including without limitation any facilities to be acquired with the proceeds of the securities issued under this part 7.

"Net revenues" or "net pledged revenues" means all pledged revenues after the deduction of operation and maintenance expenses.

"Operation and maintenance expenses" means such reasonable and necessary current expenses of the district, paid or accrued, of operating, maintaining, and repairing the facilities pertaining to the pledged revenues for the payment of the securities issued under this part 7, as may be determined by a committee, and the term may include, at a committee's option, except as limited by contract or otherwise limited by law, without limiting the generality of the foregoing:

Legal and overhead expenses of the various district departments directly related and reasonably allocable to the administration of the facilities;

Fidelity bond and insurance premiums appertaining to the facilities or a reasonably allocable share of a premium of any blanket bond or policy pertaining to the facilities;

The reasonable charges of any paying agent or depository bank appertaining to any securities issued by a district or appertaining to any facilities;

Contractual services, professional services, salaries, administrative expenses, and costs of labor appertaining to facilities;

The costs incurred by a district in the collection of all or any part of the pledged revenues, including without limitation revenues appertaining to any facilities;

Any costs of utility services furnished to the facilities by the district or otherwise.

"Operation and maintenance expenses" does not include:

Any allowance for depreciation;

Any costs of reconstruction, improvements, extensions, or betterments;

Any accumulation of reserves for capital replacements;

Any reserves for operation, maintenance, or repair of any facilities;

Any allowance for the redemption of any bond securities evidencing a loan or other obligations, or the payment of any interest thereon;

Any liabilities incurred in the acquisition or improvement of any properties comprising any project or any existing facilities, or any combination thereof;

Any other ground of legal liability not based on contract.

Services, contracts, investments, and other miscellaneous unrestricted sources of income not designated in this part 7, whether presently realized or to be realized, and accounted for in a miscellaneous sales and services fund or account.

"Pledged revenues" means the moneys pledged wholly or in part for the payment of securities issued under this article and, subject to any existing pledges or other contractual limitations, may include, at a committee's discretion, any grants, appropriations, or other donations from the United States or its agencies or from any other donor, except the state or its agencies or political subdivisions, and income or moneys derived from one, all, or any combination of the following revenue sources, including without limitation student fees and other fees, rates, and charges appertaining thereto and for the development thereof:

(I) Dormitories, apartments, and other housing facilities;

(II) Cafeterias, dining halls, and other food service facilities;

(III) Student union and other student activities facilities;

(IV) Store or other facilities for the sale or lease of books, stationery, student supplies, faculty supplies, office supplies, and like material;

(V) Theater, gymnasium, fieldhouse, stadium, arena, and other recreation or athletic facilities for use in part by spectators or otherwise;

(VI) Land and any structures, other facilities, or improvements thereon used or available for use for the parking of vehicles used for the transportation by land or air of persons to or from such land and any improvements thereon;

(VII) Properties providing heat or any other utility furnished by a district to any facilities on campus;

"Pledged revenues" does not include income or moneys derived in connection with any of the following:

Any tuition charges and registration fees;

The levy of any general (ad valorem) property taxes;

Any grants, appropriations, or other donations from the state, its agencies, or its political subdivisions.

"Registration fees" means any charges paid by any student for the privilege of registering for attendance at a local district college in a district, except for any charges appertaining to those revenue sources set forth in subsection (6)(a) of this section.

"Securities" means bonds and interim securities authorized to be issued under this part 7 in the name of and on the behalf of a district.

"Tuition charges" means the price of or payment for general and special instruction of students as defined and determined from time to time by the committee.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 781, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-703. Power to issue securities.

The committee of any district, pursuant to authorizing resolution and subject to the provisions and contractual limitations in resolutions authorizing outstanding revenue bonds and other securities of the district, may issue, without an election, securities to defray, in whole or in part, the cost of a project in the manner provided in and subject to the limitations imposed by this part 7.

The project may be the acquisition, by purchase, construction, or otherwise, the improvement, or the equipment, or any combination thereof, of any dormitory, faculty or student housing unit, dining hall, recreational center, student center, laboratory, classroom, classroom building, administrative office, administrative building, swimming pool, gymnasium, athletic field, stadium, and any other building, structure, or land necessary or desirable for use in connection with a local district college of a district.

The cost of the project may include, in the committee's discretion, all incidental costs pertaining to the project and the financing thereof, including, without limitation, contingencies and the capitalization with proceeds of securities of operation and maintenance expenses appertaining to facilities to be acquired and interest on the securities for any period not exceeding the period estimated by the committee to effect the project plus one year, of any discount on the securities and of any reserves for payment of principal of and interest on the securities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 783, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-704. Interim securities.

The committee may issue interim securities, which may be designated "bonds", "notes", or "warrants", evidencing any emergency loans, construction loans, and other temporary loans of not exceeding three years, in supplementation of long-term financing, such interim securities to be funded with the proceeds of long-term securities, net pledged revenues, or further interim securities, or any combination thereof, as the committee may determine.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 783, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-705. Terms of securities.

Except to the extent inconsistent with this part 7, any securities issued under this part 7 for any project shall be issued in the form and manner and with the effect provided in sections 11-54-111 and 11-54-112, C.R.S., for public securities issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

The authorizing resolution, trust indenture, or other instrument appertaining thereto may contain any of the covenants, and the committee may do such acts and things as are permitted in section 11-54-113, C.R.S., of the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

Revenue obligations issued to refund revenue bonds of a district and to refund securities issued under this part 7 may be issued under the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law".

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Refunding Revenue Securities Law", see article 54 of title 11.

23-71-706. Payable from special fund.

The securities shall be payable and collectible, as to principal, interest, and any prior redemption premium, solely out of net pledged revenues; the holder thereof may not look to any general or other fund for such payment of such securities, except the net revenues pledged therefor; the securities shall not constitute an indebtedness or a debt within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision or limitation, if any such provision or limitation appertains thereto; the securities shall not be considered or held to be general obligations of the district but shall constitute its special obligations; and the full faith and credit of the district shall not be pledged for their payment. Such payment shall not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of property of the district, except for its pledged revenues. No property of the district, subject to said exception, shall be liable to be forfeited or taken in payment of securities.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-707. Recital of regularity.

A resolution providing for the issuance of bonds or other securities under this part 7 or an indenture or other proceedings appertaining thereto may provide that the securities contain a recital that they are issued pursuant to this part 7, which recital shall be conclusive evidence of their validity and the regularity of their issuance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-708. Committee determination conclusive.

The determination of the committee that the limitations imposed under this part 7 upon the issuance of securities under this part 7 have been met shall be conclusive in the absence of fraud or arbitrary and gross abuse of discretion, regardless of whether the authorizing resolution or the securities thereby authorized contain a recital as authorized by section 23-71-707.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-709. No impairment of contract.

Nothing in this part 7 or in any other law shall impair the existing obligations of contract embodied in outstanding revenue bonds validly issued under the statutes in force at the times of their issue prior to July 1, 1967.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-710. Tax exemption.

Bonds and other securities issued under the provisions of this part 7, their transfer, and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation by this state or any subdivision thereof.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-711. Construction.

This part 7, without reference to other statutes of this state, except as otherwise expressly provided in this part 7, constitutes full authority for the exercise of the incidental powers granted in this part 7 concerning the borrowing of money to defray wholly or in part the cost of any project and the issuance of securities to evidence such loans.

No other act or law with regard to the authorization or issuance of securities or the exercise of any other power granted in this part 7 that requires an approval or in any way impedes or restricts the carrying out of the acts authorized to be done in this part 7 shall be construed as applying to any proceedings taken under this part 7 or acts done pursuant thereto, except as otherwise provided in this part 7.

The powers conferred by this part 7 shall be in addition and supplemental to, and not in substitution for, and the limitations imposed by this part 7 shall not affect the powers conferred by any other law.

Nothing in this part 7 shall prevent the exercise of any power granted to the committee or to a district acting by and through its committee, or any officer, agent, or employee thereof, by any other law.

No part of this part 7 shall repeal or affect any other law or part thereof, it being intended that this part 7 provide a separate method of accomplishing its objectives and not an exclusive one; and this part 7 shall not be construed as repealing, amending, or changing any such other law.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 784, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-712. Liberal construction.

This part 7, being necessary to secure the public health, safety, convenience, and welfare, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1.

23-71-713. Validation.

All pledges of pledged revenues (including but not necessarily limited to grants, appropriations, and other donations from the United States or its agencies and any other donor, except the state or its agencies or political subdivisions) made to the payment of revenue bonds of local college districts and community and technical colleges prior to April 5, 1973, and all revenue bonds of local college districts and community and technical colleges which were issued prior to said date are validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire article added, p. 785, § 1, effective July 1.